Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.022

Amateur radio operator license plates.

"Amateur radio operator license plates" means special license plates displaying amateur radio call letters assigned by the federal communications commission.

[ 2010 c 161 s 103.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.